Massachusetts, session 194th, S267.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 115A of chapter 6 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the figure “$5,000,000” in line 31, and
inserting in place thereof the following figure:- "$10,000,000".
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1